Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.780

Teachers required to be members.

All teachers who become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after October 1, 1977, shall be members of the retirement system and shall be governed by the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825.

[ 1991 c 35 s 67; 1990 c 274 s 15; 1979 ex.s. c 45 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Findings—Construction—1990 c 274: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Application—Reservation—1990 c 274 ss 11, 12, 14, and 15: See note following RCW 41.40.690.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 45: See note following RCW 41.26.040.

Effective date—Severability—Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 293: See notes following RCW 41.32.755.